Georgia, session 2025_26, HB393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Safer Cycling in Georgia Act."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 40-6-291 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to traffic laws
applicable to bicycles, operation upon paved shoulder, and signaling of right hand turns, is
amended by revising subsection (c) and by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any Any person operating a bicycle may
shall signal a right turn with his or her right arm and hand extended horizontally or with
H. B. 393 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 57 0240S
his or her left hand and arm extended upward and shall signal a left turn with his or her left
hand and arm extended horizontally not less than 50 feet prior to such person completing
the turn; provided, however, that no arm and hand signals shall be required when doing so
would create an unsafe condition as to endanger any person.
(d) Any person operating a bicycle while approaching a stop sign at an intersection or
junction with a highway with two or fewer lanes shall slow down to a speed reasonable for
the existing conditions and, if required for safety, shall stop at the point nearest the
roadway of such intersection or junction where the operator of the bicycle has a view of
approaching traffic before entering such intersection or junction. After slowing to a
reasonable speed or stopping, the operator of the bicycle shall yield the right of way to any
pedestrian or vehicle in the intersection or junction or approaching on another highway so
closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the operator of the bicycle is
moving across or within the intersection or junction; provided, however, that, after slowing
to a reasonable speed, the operator of the bicycle may make a turn or proceed through an
intersection or junction without stopping when no other pedestrian or vehicle is
approaching the intersection or junction so closely as to constitute a hazard for the operator
of the bicycle to turn or proceed."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 393 (SUB)
- 2 -